Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.295

Dependent care assistance program—Health care authority—Powers, duties, and functions.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of retirement systems pertaining to the dependent care assistance program are transferred to the health care authority.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of retirement systems pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the health care authority. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the health care authority.

(b) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of retirement systems pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the health care authority. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the health care authority.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the department of retirement systems shall not affect the validity of any act performed before January 1, 2009.

(5) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public employment relations commission as provided by law.

[ 2008 c 229 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 229: "This act takes effect January 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 229 s 15.]